Ohio, session 136, SB454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 6109.041 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 6109.041. The director of environmental protection, in a manner consistent with federal law, shall adopt rules under section 6109.04 of the Revised Code to allow a public water system to use point-of-use and point-of-entry treatment devices to reduce any contaminant in order to achieve compliance with a maximum contaminant level established under this chapter or in rules adopted under it. The director may impose conditions on a public water system that uses point-of-use or point-of-entry treatment devices to protect public health and safety.